dictionaries/pt_PT.aff
SFX r Y 46
SFX r   ogia           ógico          logia
SFX r   ogia           ógica          logia
SFX r   ogia           ógicos         logia
SFX r   ogia           ógicas         logia
SFX r   ografia        ógrafo         ografia
SFX r   ografia        ógrafa         ografia
SFX r   ografia        ógrafos        ografia
SFX r   ografia        ógrafas        ografia
SFX r   omia           ómico          nomia
SFX r   omia           ómica          nomia
SFX r   omia           ómicos         nomia
SFX r   omia           ómicas         nomia
SFX r   ia             íaco           mania
SFX r   ia             íaca           mania
SFX r   ia             íacos          mania
SFX r   ia             íacas          mania
SFX r   acia           ático          cracia
SFX r   acia           ática          cracia
SFX r   acia           áticos         cracia
SFX r   acia           áticas         cracia
SFX r   icultura       ícola          icultura
SFX r   icultura       ícolas         icultura
SFX r   arquia         árquico        arquia
SFX r   arquia         árquica        arquia
SFX r   arquia         árquicos       arquia
SFX r   arquia         árquicas       arquia
SFX r   obia           óbico          fobia
SFX r   obia           óbica          fobia
SFX r   obia           óbicos         fobia
SFX r   obia           óbicas         fobia
SFX r   atia           ático          patia
SFX r   atia           ática          patia
SFX r   atia           áticos         patia
SFX r   atia           áticas         patia
SFX r   etria          étrico         metria
SFX r   etria          étrica         metria
SFX r   etria          étricos        metria
SFX r   etria          étricas        metria
SFX r   orfia          órfico         morfia
SFX r   orfia          órfica         morfia
SFX r   orfia          órficos        morfia
SFX r   orfia          órficas        morfia
SFX r   morfismo       mórfico        morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       mórfica        morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       mórficos       morfismo
SFX r   morfismo       mórficas       morfismo

SFX s Y 36
SFX s   o              íssimo         [^cçg]o
SFX s   co             quíssimo       co
SFX s   ço             císsimo        ço
SFX s   go             guíssimo       go
SFX s   e              íssimo         e
SFX s   0              íssimo         [lr]
SFX s   ês             esíssimo       ês
SFX s   z              císsimo        z
SFX s   ável           abilíssimo     ável
SFX s   o              íssima         [^cçg]o
SFX s   co             quíssima       co
SFX s   ço             císsima        ço
SFX s   go             guíssima       go
SFX s   e              íssima         e
SFX s   0              íssima         [lr]
SFX s   ês             esíssima       ês
SFX s   z              císsima        z
SFX s   ável           abilíssima     ável
SFX s   o              íssimos        [^cçg]o
SFX s   co             quíssimos      co
SFX s   ço             císsimos       ço
SFX s   go             guíssimos      go
SFX s   e              íssimos        e
SFX s   0              íssimos        [lr]
SFX s   ês             esíssimos      ês
SFX s   z              císsimos       z
SFX s   ável           abilíssimos    ável
SFX s   o              íssimas        [^cçg]o
SFX s   co             quíssimas      co
SFX s   ço             císsimas       ço
SFX s   go             guíssimas      go
SFX s   e              íssimas        e
SFX s   0              íssimas        [lr]
SFX s   ês             esíssimas      ês
SFX s   z              císsimas       z
SFX s   ável           abilíssimas    ável

SFX d Y 22
SFX d   o              idade          [^çg]o
SFX d   ço             cidade         ço
SFX d   go             guidade        go
SFX d   e              idade          e
SFX d   0              idade          r
SFX d   0              idade          [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel            bilidade       [^áíú]vel
SFX d   ável           abilidade      ável
SFX d   ível           ibilidade      ível
SFX d   úvel           ubilidade      úvel
SFX d   z              cidade         z
SFX d   o              idades         [^çg]o
SFX d   ço             cidades        ço
SFX d   go             guidades       go
SFX d   e              idades         e
SFX d   0              idades         r
SFX d   0              idades         [^v][^q]l
SFX d   vel            bilidades      [^áí]vel
SFX d   ável           abilidades     ável
SFX d   ível           ibilidades     ível
SFX d   úvel           ubilidades     úvel
SFX d   z              cidades        z

SFX i Y 24
SFX i   o              ismo           [^cçã]o
SFX i   co             quismo         co
SFX i   ço             cismo          ço
SFX i   ção            cionismo       ção
SFX i   a              ismo           [^icg]a
SFX i   a              smo            ia
SFX i   ca             quismo         ca
SFX i   ga             guismo         ga
SFX i   e              ismo           e
SFX i   0              ismo           [lr]
SFX i   ês             esismo         ês
SFX i   m              nismo          m
SFX i   o              ismos          [^cçã]o
SFX i   co             quismos        co
SFX i   ço             cismos         ço
SFX i   ção            cionismos      ção
SFX i   a              ismos          [^icg]a
SFX i   a              smos           ia
SFX i   ca             quismos        ca
SFX i   ga             guismos        ga
SFX i   e              ismos          e
SFX i   0              ismos          [lr]
SFX i   ês             esismos        ês
SFX i   m              nismos         m

SFX t Y 24
SFX t   o              ista           [^cçãi]o
SFX t   co             quista         co
SFX t   ço             cista          ço
SFX t   ção            cionista       ção
SFX t   são            sionista       são
SFX t   io             ísta           io
SFX t   a              ista           [^içg]a
SFX t   a              sta            ia
SFX t   ça             cista          ça
SFX t   a              uista          ga
SFX t   e              ista           e
SFX t   0              ista           [lr]
SFX t   o              istas          [^cçã]o
SFX t   co             quistas        co
SFX t   ço             cistas         ço
SFX t   ção            cionistas      ção
SFX t   são            sionistas      são
SFX t   io             ístas          io
SFX t   a              istas          [^içg]a
SFX t   a              stas           ia
SFX t   ça             cistas         ça
SFX t   a              uistas         ga
SFX t   e              istas          e
SFX t   0              istas          [lr]
